Utah statutes.
78B-4-501.   Good Samaritan Act.
(1)  A person who renders emergency care at or near the scene of, or during an
emergency, gratuitously and in good faith, is not liable for any civil damages
or penalties as a result of any act or omission by the person rendering the
emergency care, unless the person is grossly negligent or caused the
emergency.  As used in this section, "emergency" means an unexpected
occurrence involving injury, threat of injury, or illness to a person or the
public, including motor vehicle accidents, disasters, actual or threatened
discharges, removal, or disposal of hazardous materials, and other accidents
or events of a similar nature.  "Emergency care" includes actual assistance or
advice offered to avoid, mitigate, or attempt to mitigate the effects of an
emergency.
(2)  A person who gratuitously, and in good faith, assists governmental
agencies or political subdivisions in the activities described in Subsections
(2)(a) through (c) is not liable for any civil damages or penalties as a
result of any act or omission unless the person rendering assistance is
grossly negligent in:
(a)  implementing measures to control the causes of epidemic and communicable
diseases and other conditions significantly affecting the public health, or
necessary to protect the public health as set out in Title 26A, Chapter 1,
Local Health Departments;
(b)  investigating and controlling suspected bioterrorism and disease as set
out in Title 26, Chapter 23b, Detection of Public Health Emergencies Act; and
(c)  responding to a national, state, or local emergency, a public health
emergency as defined in Section 26-23b-102, or a declaration by the President
of the United States or other federal official requesting public health-
related activities.
(3)  The immunity in Subsection (2) is in addition to any immunity or
protection in state or federal law that may apply.
